trunk/apertium-es-pt/apertium-es-pt.es.dix
    <pardef n="at/ender__vblex">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enderíamos</l>
          <r>ender<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endería</l>
          <r>ender<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enderíais</l>
          <r>ender<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enderías</l>
          <r>ender<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enderían</l>
          <r>ender<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endería</l>
          <r>ender<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enderemos</l>
          <r>ender<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enderé</l>
          <r>ender<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enderéis</l>
          <r>ender<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enderás</l>
          <r>ender<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enderán</l>
          <r>ender<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enderá</l>
          <r>ender<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endiéremos</l>
          <r>ender<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endiere</l>
          <r>ender<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endiereis</l>
          <r>ender<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endieres</l>
          <r>ender<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endieren</l>
          <r>ender<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endiere</l>
          <r>ender<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endiendo</l>
          <r>ender<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endiéndo</l>
          <r>ender<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantándo"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endimos</l>
          <r>ender<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endí</l>
          <r>ender<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endisteis</l>
          <r>ender<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endiste</l>
          <r>ender<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endieron</l>
          <r>ender<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endió</l>
          <r>ender<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endamos</l>
          <r>ender<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endámo</l>
          <r>ender<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantémo"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endámos</l>
          <r>ender<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantémos"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ended</l>
          <r>ender<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ende</l>
          <r>ender<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__canta"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ended</l>
          <r>ender<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantad"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endé</l>
          <r>ender<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endéd</l>
          <r>ender<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantád"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iende</l>
          <r>ender<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iénde</l>
          <r>ender<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cánta"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iendan</l>
          <r>ender<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iéndan</l>
          <r>ender<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantándo"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ienda</l>
          <r>ender<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iénda</l>
          <r>ender<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantándo"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ender</l>
          <r>ender<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ender</l>
          <r>ender<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantar"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endér</l>
          <r>ender<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantár"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endíamos</l>
          <r>ender<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endía</l>
          <r>ender<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endíais</l>
          <r>ender<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endías</l>
          <r>ender<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endían</l>
          <r>ender<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endía</l>
          <r>ender<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endiéramos</l>
          <r>ender<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>endiésemos</l>
          <r>ender<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>endiera</l>

      <e lm="atender">
        <i>at</i>
        <par n="at/ender__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="defender">
        <i>def</i>
        <par n="at/ender__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="descender">
        <i>desc</i>
        <par n="at/ender__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="entender">
        <i>ent</i>
        <par n="at/ender__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="extender">
        <i>ext</i>
        <par n="at/ender__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="tender">
        <i>t</i>
        <par n="at/ender__vblex"/>
      </e>
		<e lm="ascender">
			<i>asc</i>
			<par n="at/ender__vblex"/>
		</e>
<e lm="encender">
	<i>enc</i>
	<par n="at/ender__vblex"/>
</e>
<e lm="contender">
	<i>cont</i>
	<par n="at/ender__vblex"/>
</e>
<e lm="subtender" a="prompsit"><i>subt</i><par n="at/ender__vblex"/></e>
